Alaska, session 34, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 44.12.088. Women's History Month. The month of March each year is 05 established as Women's History Month. Women's History Month may be observed by 06 schools, community groups, and other public and private agencies and individuals 07 with appropriate activities to honor and recognize the contributions that women have 08 made in the history of the state and the United States. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.